Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3749
Commission; vacancy.

Whenever
a vacancy occurs on the commission for any reason, the Governor shall appoint
a person with the same qualifications as the initial appointee unless the
vacant position is that of a member appointed
by the commission, in which case the appointment to fill such
vacancy shall be made by the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 15;

Laws 2011, LB394, § 5.